Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1834HV (2) 91 ll/js H.F. 947 Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. a. A county shall allow a minimum of 3 one accessory dwelling unit on the same lot as a single family 4 residence in accordance with the following conditions: 5 (1) An accessory dwelling unit shall comply with all 6 applicable building regulations as defined in chapter 103A. 7 (2) An accessory dwelling unit shall not exceed one thousand 8 square feet or fifty percent of the size of the single family 9 residence, whichever is larger. 10 (3) An accessory dwelling unit shall be prohibited or 11 limited only to the extent that a state historic building code 12 restriction, as adopted by a county in accordance with section 13 103A.43, subsection 3, a deed restriction, or a rule of a 14 common interest community, as defined in section 499C.1, limits 15 or prohibits the construction or use of an accessory dwelling 16 unit. The imposition of an ordinance, motion, resolution, or 17 amendment regulating accessory dwelling units that is more 18 restrictive when applied to a common interest community than 19 when applied to a single family residence is prohibited. 20 (4) If a manufactured home as defined in section 435.1, 21 subsection 3, or a mobile home as defined in section 435.1, 22 subsection 5, is used as an accessory dwelling unit, the 23 manufactured home or mobile home shall be converted to real 24 property by being placed on a permanent foundation and assessed 25 for real estate taxes pursuant to section 435.26. 26 b. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph âaâ or by state 27 law, a county shall not impose any of the following limitations 28 or restrictions: 29 (1) Requirements related to the placement or appearance of 30 an accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than those 31 imposed on a single family residence including but not limited 32 to the following: maximum building heights; minimum setback 33 requirements; minimum lot sizes; minimum building frontages; 34 maximum lot coverages; density requirements; and aesthetic 35 -1- LSB 1834HV (2) 91 ll/js 1/ 9 H.F. 947 or architectural standards or requirements. Additionally, a 1 county shall not require an accessory dwelling unit to match 2 the exterior design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the 3 single family residence. 4 (2) Regulations on the use of an accessory dwelling unit as 5 a rental property that are more restrictive than those provided 6 for in subsection 18 of this section and chapter 562A. 7 (3) A requirement that the lot containing a single family 8 residence and an accessory dwelling unit have additional 9 parking beyond that required for a single family residence or 10 payment of a fee in lieu of providing additional parking. 11 (4) Restrictions on the occupancy of either the single 12 family residence or the accessory dwelling unit by any of 13 the following manners: requiring the property owner to be 14 a resident; requiring a familial, marital, or employment 15 relationship to exist between the occupants of the single 16 family residence and the occupants of the accessory dwelling 17 unit; or restricting the occupancy of an accessory dwelling 18 unit based on income or age. 19 (5) The requirement of new or separate utility lines 20 between the accessory dwelling unit and public utility service 21 connections. However, if full utility access that includes 22 a separate metering system for billing purposes cannot be 23 provided to the accessory dwelling unit, then the county can 24 require new or separate utility lines. 25 (6) Imposition of a different county impact fee structure or 26 development standard for an accessory dwelling unit than those 27 used for the single family residence on the same lot. 28 (7) The requirement of improvements or repairs to public 29 streets or sidewalks beyond those imposed on the single family 30 residence on the same lot. 31 c. A county shall approve an accessory dwelling unit permit 32 application that meets the requirements set forth in paragraph 33 âaâ and by state law without discretionary review or hearing 34 and consistent with the time frame assigned to the approval of 35 -2- LSB 1834HV (2) 91 ll/js 2/ 9 H.F. 947 a single family residence. An accessory dwelling unit permit 1 application shall not have a review timeline or schedule in 2 excess of a countyâs normal review schedule for a single family 3 residence. If the county denies an accessory dwelling unit 4 permit, the reason for denial shall be provided in writing 5 to the applicant and include any remedy necessary to secure 6 approval. 7 d. A county ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment 8 regulating accessory dwelling units in a manner that conflicts 9 with this subsection is void. Nothing in this subsection 10 prohibits a county from adopting an ordinance, motion, 11 resolution, or amendment that is more permissive than the 12 requirements provided in this subsection. 13 e. For the purposes of this subsection: 14 (1) âAccessory dwelling unitâ means an additional 15 residential dwelling unit located on the same lot as a single 16 family residence that is either attached to or detached from 17 the single family residence. 18 (2) âDetachedâ includes being part of any accessory 19 structure such as a detached garage. 20 (3) âDwelling unitâ means the same as defined in section 21 562A.6, subsection 3. 22 (4) âSingle family residenceâ means the same as defined 23 in section 562A.6, subsection 15, except to the extent that 24 a single family residence may share utility lines with the 25 accessory dwelling unit if full utility access that includes a 26 separate metering system for billing purposes can be provided 27 to the accessory dwelling unit. 28 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsection: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. a. A city shall allow a minimum of 31 one accessory dwelling unit on the same lot as a single family 32 residence in accordance with the following conditions: 33 (1) An accessory dwelling unit shall comply with all 34 applicable building regulations as defined in chapter 103A. 35 -3- LSB 1834HV (2) 91 ll/js 3/ 9 H.F. 947 (2) An accessory dwelling unit shall not exceed one thousand 1 square feet or fifty percent of the size of the single family 2 residence, whichever is larger. 3 (3) An accessory dwelling unit shall be prohibited or 4 limited only to the extent that a state historic building code 5 restriction, as adopted by a city in accordance with section 6 103A.43, subsection 3, a deed restriction, or a rule of a 7 common interest community, as defined in section 499C.1, limits 8 or prohibits the construction or use of an accessory dwelling 9 unit. The imposition of an ordinance, motion, resolution, or 10 amendment regulating accessory dwelling units that is more 11 restrictive when applied to a common interest community than 12 when applied to a single family residence is prohibited. 13 (4) If a manufactured home as defined in section 435.1, 14 subsection 3, or a mobile home as defined in section 435.1, 15 subsection 5, is used as an accessory dwelling unit, the 16 manufactured home or mobile home shall be converted to real 17 property by being placed on a permanent foundation and assessed 18 for real estate taxes pursuant to section 435.26. 19 b. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph âaâ or by state 20 law, a city shall not impose any of the following limitations 21 or restrictions: 22 (1) Requirements related to the placement or appearance of 23 an accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than those 24 imposed on a single family residence including but not limited 25 to the following: maximum building heights; minimum setback 26 requirements; minimum lot sizes; minimum building frontages; 27 maximum lot coverages; density requirements; and aesthetic 28 or architectural standards or requirements. Additionally, a 29 city shall not require an accessory dwelling unit to match the 30 exterior design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the 31 single family residence. 32 (2) Regulations on the use of an accessory dwelling unit as 33 a rental property that are more restrictive than those provided 34 for in subsections 9 and 16 of this section, section 414.1, 35 -4- LSB 1834HV (2) 91 ll/js 4/ 9 H.F. 947 subsection 1, paragraph âeâ , and chapter 562A. 1 (3) A requirement that the lot containing a single family 2 residence and an accessory dwelling unit have additional 3 parking beyond that required for a single-family residence or 4 payment of a fee in lieu of providing additional parking. 5 (4) Restrictions on the occupancy of either the single 6 family residence or the accessory dwelling unit by any of 7 the following manners: requiring the property owner to be 8 a resident; requiring a familial, marital, or employment 9 relationship to exist between the occupants of the single 10 family residence and the occupants of the accessory dwelling 11 unit; or restricting the occupancy of an accessory dwelling 12 unit based on income or age. 13 (5) A requirement of new or separate utility lines between 14 the accessory dwelling unit and public utility service 15 connections. However, if full utility access that includes 16 a separate metering system for billing purposes cannot be 17 provided to the accessory dwelling unit, then the city can 18 require new or separate utility lines. 19 (6) Imposition of a different city impact fee structure or 20 development standard for an accessory dwelling unit than those 21 used for the single family residence on the same lot. 22 (7) The requirement of improvements or repairs to public 23 streets or sidewalks beyond those imposed on the single family 24 residence on the same lot. 25 c. A city shall approve an accessory dwelling unit permit 26 application that meets the requirements set forth in paragraph 27 âaâ and by state law without discretionary review or hearing 28 and consistent with the time frame assigned to the approval of 29 a single family residence. An accessory dwelling unit permit 30 application shall not have a review timeline or schedule in 31 excess of a cityâs normal review schedule for a single family 32 residence. If the city denies an accessory dwelling unit 33 permit, the reason for denial shall be provided in writing 34 to the applicant and include any remedy necessary to secure 35 -5- LSB 1834HV (2) 91 ll/js 5/ 9 H.F. 947 approval. 1 d. A city ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment 2 regulating accessory dwelling units in a manner that conflicts 3 with this subsection is void. Nothing in this subsection 4 prohibits a city from adopting an ordinance, motion, 5 resolution, or amendment that is more permissive than the 6 requirements provided in this subsection. 7 e. For the purposes of this subsection: 8 (1) âAccessory dwelling unitâ means an additional 9 residential dwelling unit located on the same lot as a single 10 family residence that is either attached to or detached from 11 the single family residence. 12 (2) âDetachedâ includes being part of an accessory structure 13 such as a detached garage. 14 (3) âDwelling unitâ means the same as defined in section 15 562A.6, subsection 3. 16 (4) âSingle family residenceâ means the same as defined 17 in section 562A.6, subsection 15, except to the extent that 18 a single family residence may share utility lines with the 19 accessory dwelling unit if full utility access that includes a 20 separate metering system for billing purposes can be provided 21 to the accessory dwelling unit. 22